liblouis-back-translation-tables/ml-in-g3-abk.utb
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D15 	  13-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER KA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D16 	  46-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER KHA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D17 	  1245-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER GA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D18 	  126-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER GHA

before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D1A 	  14-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER CA= CHA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D1B 	  16-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER CHA= CHHA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D1C 	  245-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER JA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D1D  356-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER JHA
	
before MalayalamVowel always	 \x0D1F   23456-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER TTA= TA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D20 	  2456-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER TTHA= TTA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D21 	  1246-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER DDA= HARD DA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D22 	  123456-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER DDHA= HARD DDA
###@@@ before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D23 	  3456-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER NNA= HARD NA

before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D24 	  2345-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER TA= THA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D25 	  1456-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER THA= TTHA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D26 	  145-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER DA= SOFT DA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D27 	  2346-1 # MALAYALAM LETTER DHA= SOFT DDA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D28 	  1345-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER NA

before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D2A 	  1234-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER PA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D2B 	  235-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER PHA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D2C 	  12-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER BA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D2D 	  45-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER BHA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D2E 	  134-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER MA

before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D2F 	  13456-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER YA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D30 	  1235-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER RA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D31 	  12456-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER RRA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D32 	  123-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER LA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D33 	  456-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER LLA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D34 	  12356-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER LLLA= ZHA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D35 	  1236-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER VA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D36 	  146-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER SHA= SOFT SHA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D37 	  12346-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER SSA= SHA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D38 	  234-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER SA
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D39 	  125-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER HA

before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D44 	  6-1235-1	# MALAYALAM VOWEL SIGN VOCALIC RR
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D60 	  6-1235-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER VOCALIC RR
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D61 	  6-123-1	# MALAYALAM LETTER VOCALIC LL
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D62 	  5-123-1	  # MALAYALAM VOWEL SIGN VOCALIC L
before MalayalamVowel always	\x0D63 	  6-123-1 	# MALAYALAM VOWEL SIGN VOCALIC LL


# For symbols of vowel which only appear in the middle or end while doing backward translation
nofor midendword	\x0D3E	345	# MALAYALAM VOWEL SIGN AA
nofor midendword	\x0D3F	24	# MALAYALAM VOWEL SIGN I
nofor midendword	\x0D40	35	# MALAYALAM VOWEL SIGN II
nofor midendword	\x0D41	136	# MALAYALAM VOWEL SIGN U
nofor midendword	\x0D42	1256	# MALAYALAM VOWEL SIGN UU
### nofor midendword	\x0D43	5-1235	# MALAYALAM VOWEL SIGN VOCALIC R
nofor midendword	\x0D44	6-1235	# MALAYALAM VOWEL SIGN VOCALIC RR
nofor midendword	\x0D46	26	# MALAYALAM VOWEL SIGN E (stands to the left of the consonant)
nofor midendword	\x0D47	15	# MALAYALAM VOWEL SIGN EE (stands to the left of the consonant)
nofor midendword	\x0D48	34	# MALAYALAM VOWEL SIGN AI
nofor midendword	\x0D4A	1346	# MALAYALAM VOWEL SIGN O= 0D46 ? and 0D3E ?
nofor midendword	\x0D4B	135	# MALAYALAM VOWEL SIGN OO= 0D47 ? AND 0D3E ?
nofor midendword     \x0D4C     246	# MALAYALAM VOWEL SIGN AU (archaic from the au/dependent vowel to 0D57 ?  MALAYALAM au length mark= 0D46 ? and 0D57 ?)
nofor midendword	\x0D4D	4	# MALAYALAM SIGN VIRAMA= chandrakkala (the preferred name)= vowel half U
nofor midendword	\x0D60	6-1235	# MALAYALAM LETTER VOCALIC RR
nofor midendword	\x0D61	6-123	# MALAYALAM LETTER VOCALIC LL
nofor midendword	\x0D62	5-123	# MALAYALAM VOWEL SIGN VOCALIC L
nofor midendword	\x0D63	6-123	# MALAYALAM VOWEL SIGN VOCALIC LL


# For backward translation chandrakkala (vowel half U) at the end of the word
nofor endword	\x0D4D	3	
nofor endword	\x0D4D\x002E	3-256	

# In backward translation creating CHILLU dot-3 is used before the CHILLU letter. 
nofor midendword \x0D7A	3-3456	# MALAYALAM LETTER CHILLU NN
nofor midendword \x0D7B	3-1345	# MALAYALAM LETTER CHILLU N
nofor midendword \x0D7C	3-12456	# MALAYALAM LETTER CHILLU RR
nofor midendword \x0D7D	3-123	# MALAYALAM LETTER CHILLU L
nofor midendword \x0D7E	3-456	# MALAYALAM LETTER CHILLU LL

# Since NHA is defined in en-in-g1.ctb as colon we have to define NHA and Double NHA separately 
always \x0D1E\x0D4D\x0D1E	4-25-25	# MALAYALAM WORD DOUBLE NYA= NHA
sufword \x0D1E 25	# MALAYALAM LETTER NYA= NHA
midendword	\x0D23	3456	# MALAYALAM LETTER NNA= HARD NA
prfword \x0D23	3456	# MALAYALAM LETTER NNA= HARD NA
always \x0D1C\x0D4D\x0D1E	4-245-25	# MALAYALAM WORD JNHA

# Added for fixing ambiguity between math characters and letter KHA
always \x0D16\x0D2C 46-12
always \x0D16\x0D1A 46-14
always \x0D16\x0D26 46-145
always \x0D16\x0D47 46-15
always \x0D16\x0D17 46-1245
always \x0D16\x0D39 46-125
always \x0D16\x0D3F 46-24
always \x0D16\x0D1C 46-245
always \x0D16\x0D15 46-13
always \x0D16\x0D2E 46-134
always \x0D16\x0D1E 46-25
always \x0D16\x0D46 46-26
always \x0D16\x0D40 46-35
always \x0D16\x0D1D 46-356

# Added for fixing conflict between numeral 9 and word NIM
sufword \x0D23\x0D3F\x0D02 3456-24-56


### Section 1  
# Dot-5 Word Contractions
word \x0D05\x0D35\x0D33\x0D4D\x200D 5-23
word \x0D05\x0D35\x0D30\x0D4D\x200D 5-2356
word \x0D05\x0D2F\x0D3E\x0D33\x0D4D\x200D 5-36
word \x0D05\x0D26\x0D4D\x0D26\x0D47\x0D39\x0D02 5-256
word \x0D05\x0D35\x0D28\x0D4D\x200D 5-236

# Dot-5 Sufword Contractions
sufword \x0D06\x0D35\x0D36\x0D4D\x0D2F 5-345
sufword \x0D05\x0D24\x0D4D\x0D2F\x0D3E\x0D35\x0D36\x0D4D\x0D2F 5-1
sufword \x0D07\x0D24\x0D4D\x0D24\x0D30 5-24
sufword \x0D08\x0D36\x0D4D\x0D35\x0D30 5-35
sufword \x0D09\x0D26\x0D3E\x0D39\x0D30 5-136
sufword \x0D0A\x0D30\x0D4D\x200D\x0D1C\x0D4D\x0D1C 5-1256
sufword \x0D0E\x0D32\x0D4D\x0D32\x0D3E 5-26
sufword \x0D0F\x0D31\x0D4D\x0D31\x0D35\x0D41 5-15
sufword \x0D10\x0D15\x0D4D\x0D2F 5-34
sufword \x0D12\x0D30\x0D3F\x0D15\x0D4D\x0D15 5-1346
sufword \x0D13\x0D30\x0D4B 5-135
sufword \x0D14\x0D26\x0D3E\x0D30\x0D4D\x0D2F 5-246
sufword \x0D15\x0D3E\x0D30\x0D23 5-13
sufword \x0D17\x0D41\x0D23 5-1245
sufword \x0D18\x0D1F\x0D15 5-126
sufword \x0D28\x0D3F\x0D19\x0D4D\x0D19 5-346
sufword \x0D1A\x0D4B\x0D26\x0D3F 5-14
sufword \x0D05\x0D1A\x0D4D\x0D1B 5-16
sufword \x0D1C\x0D28\x0D19\x0D4D\x0D19 5-245
sufword \x0D1E\x0D19\x0D4D\x0D19 5-25
sufword \x0D15\x0D3F\x0D1F\x0D4D\x0D1F 5-23456
sufword \x0D35\x0D47\x0D23\x0D4D\x0D1F 5-123456
sufword \x0D35\x0D47\x0D23 5-3456
sufword \x0D24\x0D24\x0D4D\x0D15\x0D3E\x0D32 5-2345
sufword \x0D26\x0D3F\x0D35\x0D38 5-145
sufword \x0D27\x0D3E\x0D30\x0D3E\x0D33 5-2346
sufword \x0D28\x0D2E\x0D4D\x0D2E 5-1345
sufword \x0D2A\x0D31\x0D1E\x0D4D\x0D1E 5-1234
sufword \x0D2C\x0D28\x0D4D\x0D27\x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D2A\x0D46\x0D1F\x0D4D\x0D1F 5-12
sufword \x0D2E\x0D28\x0D41\x0D37\x0D4D\x0D2F 5-134
sufword \x0D2F\x0D25\x0D3E\x0D30\x0D4D\x200D\x0D25 5-13456
sufword \x0D32\x0D15\x0D4D\x0D37\x0D4D\x0D2F 5-123
sufword \x0D35\x0D33\x0D30\x0D46 5-1236
sufword \x0D36\x0D3E\x0D38\x0D4D\x0D24\x0D4D\x0D30 5-146
sufword \x0D38\x0D3E\x0D02\x0D38\x0D4D\x0D15\x0D3E\x0D30\x0D3F\x0D15 5-234
sufword \x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D30\x0D27\x0D3E\x0D28 5-12456
sufword \x0D2A\x0D32\x0D24\x0D30 5-124
sufword \x0D05\x0D35\x0D33 5-23
sufword \x0D05\x0D35\x0D30 5-2356
sufword \x0D05\x0D2F\x0D3E\x0D33 5-36
sufword \x0D05\x0D26\x0D4D\x0D26\x0D47\x0D39 5-256
sufword \x0D05\x0D35\x0D28 5-236


# Dot-5 Midendword Contractions
midendword \x0D3E\x0D35\x0D36\x0D4D\x0D2F 5-345
midendword \x0D3F\x0D24\x0D4D\x0D24\x0D30 5-35
midendword \x0D41\x0D26\x0D3E\x0D39\x0D30 5-136
midendword \x0D46\x0D32\x0D4D\x0D32\x0D3E 5-26
midendword \x0D47\x0D31\x0D4D\x0D31\x0D35\x0D41 5-15
midendword \x0D4A\x0D30\x0D3F\x0D15\x0D4D\x0D15 5-1346
midendword \x0D35\x0D47\x0D23\x0D4D\x0D1F 5-123456

midendword \x0D15\x0D4D\x0D37 5-126
midendword \x0D24\x0D4D\x0D38 5-1456
midendword \x0D26\x0D4D\x0D27 5-2346
midendword \x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D24 5-235
midendword \x0D2E\x0D4D\x0D2A 5-45
midendword \x0D34\x0D4D\x0D24\x0D4D\x0D24 5-12356
midendword \x0D37\x0D4D\x0D1F 5-12346
midendword \x0D37\x0D4D\x0D15 5-125
midendword \x0D38\x0D4D\x0D28 5-1256
midendword \x0D38\x0D4D\x0D31\x0D4D\x0D31 5-135
midendword \x0D38\x0D4D\x0D2A 5-246
midendword \x0D15\x0D4D\x0D15\x0D41\x0D15 5-56
midendword \x0D05\x0D35\x0D33\x0D41\x0D1F\x0D46 5-23
midendword \x0D05\x0D26\x0D4D\x0D26\x0D47\x0D39\x0D24\x0D4D\x0D24\x0D3F\x0D28\x0D4D\x0D31\x0D46 5-256
midendword \x0D05\x0D35\x0D30\x0D41\x0D1F\x0D46 5-2356


### Section 2 - 
# Dot-36 Sufword Contractions

sufword \x0D05\x0D2D\x0D3F 36-1
sufword \x0D06\x0D30\x0D02\x0D2D 36-345
sufword \x0D07\x0D19\x0D4D\x0D19\x0D28\x0D46 36-24
sufword \x0D08\x0D30\x0D4D\x200D\x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D2A 36-35
sufword \x0D09\x0D24\x0D4D\x0D24\x0D30 36-136
sufword \x0D0A\x0D37\x0D4D\x0D2E 36-1256
sufword \x0D0E\x0D19\x0D4D\x0D19\x0D28\x0D46 36-26
sufword \x0D0F\x0D24\x0D4A\x0D30\x0D41 36-15
sufword \x0D12\x0D30\x0D3F\x0D15\x0D4D\x0D15 36-1346
sufword \x0D13\x0D30\x0D4B 36-135
sufword \x0D15\x0D43\x0D37\x0D3F 36-13
sufword \x0D1A\x0D4B\x0D26\x0D4D\x0D2F 36-14
sufword \x0D1C\x0D40\x0D35 36-245
sufword \x0D26\x0D3F\x0D28 36-145
sufword \x0D28\x0D3F\x0D36\x0D4D\x0D1A 36-1345
sufword \x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D30\x0D24\x0D3F 36-1234
sufword \x0D2B\x0D32\x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D30\x0D26 36-235
sufword \x0D2C\x0D39\x0D41 36-12
sufword \x0D2D\x0D3E\x0D30\x0D24 36-45
sufword \x0D2E\x0D39\x0D3E 36-134
sufword \x0D2F\x0D3E\x0D24\x0D4A\x0D30\x0D41 36-13456
sufword \x0D30\x0D3E\x0D37\x0D4D\x0D1F\x0D4D\x0D30 36-1235
sufword \x0D32\x0D4B\x0D15 36-123
sufword \x0D35\x0D3F\x0D26\x0D4D\x0D2F\x0D3E 36-1236
sufword \x0D36\x0D2C\x0D4D\x0D26 36-146
sufword \x0D38\x0D39\x0D3E\x0D2F 36-234


### Section 3 - Dot-456 Contractions
sufword \x0D05\x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D30\x0D15\x0D3E\x0D30 456-1
sufword \x0D07\x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D30\x0D15\x0D3E\x0D30 456-24
sufword \x0D0E\x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D30\x0D15\x0D3E\x0D30 456-26
sufword \x0D12\x0D30\x0D3F\x0D2E\x0D3F\x0D1A\x0D4D\x0D1A 456-1346
sufword \x0D15\x0D43\x0D24\x0D4D\x0D2F 456-13
sufword \x0D1A\x0D3F\x0D32\x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D2A\x0D4B 456-14
sufword \x0D24\x0D3E\x0D30\x0D24\x0D2E\x0D4D\x0D2F 456-2345
sufword \x0D26\x0D48\x0D35 456-145
sufword \x0D28\x0D2E\x0D4D\x0D2E 456-1345
sufword \x0D2A\x0D30\x0D38\x0D4D\x0D2A\x0D30 456-1234
sufword \x0D2C\x0D4D\x0D30\x0D46\x0D2F\x0D3F\x0D32 456-12
sufword \x0D2E\x0D32\x0D2F\x0D3E\x0D33 456-134
sufword \x0D30\x0D3E\x0D1C\x0D4D\x0D2F 456-1235
sufword \x0D32\x0D18\x0D41 456-123
sufword \x0D35\x0D3F\x0D26\x0D4D\x0D2F\x0D3E\x0D30\x0D4D\x200D\x0D25\x0D3F 456-1236
sufword \x0D38\x0D57\x0D15\x0D30\x0D4D\x0D2F 456-234
sufword \x0D39\x0D43\x0D26\x0D2F 456-125
sufword \x0D15\x0D3E\x0D34\x0D4D\x0D1A 456-12356
sufword \x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D30\x0D24\x0D4D\x0D2F\x0D47\x0D15 456-12456
sufword \x0D2C\x0D4D\x0D30\x0D46\x0D2F\x0D3F\x0D32\x0D4D\x200D 456-12
sufword \x0D35\x0D3F\x0D26\x0D4D\x0D2F\x0D3E\x0D30\x0D4D\x200D\x0D25\x0D3F 456-1236
